North Carolina, session 2025, HB1047.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Title. – This act shall be known as the North Carolina Microplastics
Study Act.
SECTION 1.(b) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Collaboratory. – The North Carolina Collaboratory at the University of North
Carolina at Chapel Hill.
(2) Inland waters. – Permanent water bodies inland from the coastal zone and
areas whose properties and use are dominated by the permanent, seasonal, or
intermittent occurrence of flooded conditions.
(3) Macroplastics. – Plastic particles greater than 5 millimeters in size.
(4) Microplastics. – Plastic particles between 1 nanometer and 5 millimeters in
size.
(5) Nanoplastics. – Plastic particles less than 1 nanometer in size.
(6) Plastic particles. – Plastics that include macroplastics, primary microplastics,
secondary microplastics, nanoplastics, and raw plastic materials.
(7) Primary microplastics. – Plastics that are intentionally manufactured at small
sizes. Examples include cosmetic beads, glitter, seed coatings, and pellets or
*H1047-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
nurdles (small, round, lens- or disc-shaped plastic pieces between 2 and 5
millimeters).
(8) Raw plastic materials. – Plastics transported as pellets or nurdles before being
melted and molded into other plastic-based products.
(9) Secondary microplastics. – Raw plastic materials or macroplastics that have
been broken down into microplastics by various environmental pathways.
SECTION 1.(c) Purpose. – The Collaboratory shall investigate the potential impact
of plastic particles on waters of the State and develop strategies to address the impacts of plastic
particles. To help guide the Collaboratory's work, the General Assembly finds that:
(1) Although substantial scientific research on plastic particles exists, further
research will complement and support continuing efforts to reduce plastic
particle pollution.
(2) In addition to the development of a long-term statewide strategy, early actions
to prevent and reduce known impacts of plastic particles to the marine
environment should be pursued.
SECTION 1.(d) Staffing and Support. – The Department of Environmental Quality
shall provide staff support to the Collaboratory. Additional staff may be hired or contracted by
the Collaboratory through funds raised by or provided to it. The duties and compensation of any
additional staff shall be determined by and fixed by the Collaboratory, within available resources.
SECTION 1.(e) Collaboration. – The Collaboratory shall complete its functions and
duties in collaboration with the State Division of Water Resources and other interested
governmental entities. The Department of Environmental Quality shall cooperate with the
Collaboratory and, upon request, shall assist the Collaboratory in fulfilling its responsibilities.
SECTION 1.(f) Duties. – The Collaboratory is charged with the following duties
consistent with the protection and conservation of rivers, lakes, estuaries, tributaries, inland
ecosystems, coastal waters, beaches, and ocean ecosystems:
(1) Identify plastic particles within the State's waterways.
(2) Research the harmful impact plastic particles have on the ecosystem.
(3) Collaborate with interested stakeholders and research institutions.
(4) Develop strategies to address the dangers of plastic particles.
(5) Implement strategies to prevent the future introduction of plastic particles into
the waterways and to reverse existing harm.
SECTION 1.(g) Tasks. – In carrying out its duties as provided in subsection (f) of
this section, the Collaboratory shall do all of the following:
(1) Conduct research and planning related to the control of plastic particles within
the waterways of the State.
(2) Enter into contracts or agreements, including cost-sharing agreements, with
public or private agencies for research and development of methods of control
of plastic particles.
(3) Develop a comprehensive prioritized research plan that includes research that
will support the development of risk assessments for plastic particles in the
marine environment habitat types of North Carolina.
(4) Develop standardized methods for sampling, detecting, and characterizing
plastic particles.
(5) Determine the ambient concentrations of plastic particles in the marine
environment and provide an assessment of the associated environmental
impacts, by plastic particle age, size, shape, type, and location.
(6) Investigate the sources and relative importance of pathways associated with
the environmental impacts of plastic particles determined to be significant.
Page 2 House Bill 1047-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Develop a risk assessment framework for plastic particles based on the best
available information on exposure of plastic particles to organisms, including
humans, through pathways that impact the marine environment.
(8) Research various approaches for reducing the introduction of plastic particles
into the marine environment from significant pathways of exposure, with an
emphasis on the sizes, shapes, and types of plastic particles that are associated
with significant environmental impacts.
(9) Utilize the risk assessment framework developed pursuant to subdivision (7)
of this subsection to evaluate options, including source reduction and product
stewardship techniques, barriers, costs, and benefits.
(10) Offer recommendations for policy changes, including statutory changes, or
additional research that may be needed.
SECTION 1.(h) Report. – The Collaboratory shall submit a comprehensive report
with findings, a detailed risk assessment, and recommended actions to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources and the
Environmental Review Commission by July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. Funding. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Collaboratory the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the study of plastic particles on the waters of the State,
including any associated research initiatives, public hearings, and stakeholder meetings. The
Collaboratory may explore potential partnerships or federal grant opportunities to supplement its
research and study efforts.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
House Bill 1047-First Edition Page 3